South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3973.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Board of trustees SECTION 1.    Section 1(B)(1)(a) of Act 432 of 1947, as last amended by Act 102 of 2015, is amended to read: (a) The board of trustees shall consist of not fewer than twelve or more than seventeen members. A membership above twelve must be first requested by the board of trustees and then approved by the Greenville County Legislative Delegation. Members must be appointed by the Greenville County Legislative Delegation pursuant to this section, unless otherwise stipulated. The members of the House of Representatives from each of the House single-member election districts in a particular house residency district, together with any member of the Senate representing any portion of these House single-member election districts in that particular house residency district, shall recommend a nominee for that seat to the full Greenville County Legislative Delegation which shall either select and appoint that nominee to the commission or reject the nominee. In this case another nominee must be recommended by the same process to the full county legislative delegation until the seat is filled. All members must be qualified electors. Members filling house district residency seats, as provided for in this subsection, must, at the time of their appointment and throughout their term of office, be residents of Greenville County residing in specified house districts that constitute a part of the specific house district residency seat. Six of the members must be considered as filling house district residency seats, with one seat being filled by a person residing in House District 18 or 20; one residing in House District 5, 17, or 19; one residing in House District 16, 21, or 35; one residing in House District 22 or 24; one residing in House District 23 or 25; and one residing in House District 7, 10, 27, or 28. The remaining members must be at large, at least four of whom must reside in Greenville County. Two of the members must reside in the City of Greenville, but no more than three of the members may reside in the city limits of a single municipality. Appointment of members who are residents of the City of Greenville must be submitted for review by the City of Greenville as provided in item (3). Members shall represent all communities served by the Greenville Health System regardless of residency and shall make decisions in the best interest of the Greenville Health System as a whole and all those it serves. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 13th day of May, 2025. __________